Wyoming statutes. Title 14 Children
Article 9. Child of Assisted Reproduction

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Rights and obligations resulting from human artificial insemination, 83 ALR4th 295.

Determination of status as legal or natural parents in contested surrogacy births, 77 ALR5th 567.

§ 14-2-901.
Scope of article.

This article does not apply to the birth of a child conceived by means of sexual intercourse or to the birth of a child under a gestational agreement as defined by W.S. 35-1-401(a)(xiv).

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 1; 2021 ch. 87, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, added "or to the birth of a child under a gestational agreement as defined by W.S. 35-1-401(a)(xiv)."

§ 14-2-902.
Parental status of donor.

A donor is not a parent of a child conceived by means of assisted reproduction.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 1.

§ 14-2-903.
Paternity of child of assisted reproduction.

A man who provides sperm for, or consents to, assisted reproduction by a woman as provided in W.S.

14-2-904

, with the intent to be the parent of her child, is the parent of the resulting child.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 1.

§ 14-2-904.
Consent to assisted reproduction.

Consent by a woman and a man who intends to be the parent of a child born to the woman by assisted reproduction shall be in a record signed by the woman and the man. This requirement shall not apply to a donor.

Failure to sign a consent required by subsection (a) of this section, before or after birth of the child, does not preclude a finding of paternity if the woman and the man, during the first two (2) years of the child’s life resided together in the same household with the child and openly held out the child as their own.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 1.

§ 14-2-905.
Limitation on husband's dispute of paternity.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, the husband of a wife who gives birth to a child by means of assisted reproduction may not challenge his paternity of the child unless:

Within two (2) years after learning of the birth of the child he commences a proceeding to adjudicate his paternity; and

The court finds that he did not consent to the assisted reproduction, before or after birth of the child.

A proceeding to adjudicate paternity may be maintained at any time if the court determines that:

The husband did not provide sperm for, or before or after the birth of the child consent to, assisted reproduction by his wife;

The husband and the mother of the child have not cohabited since the probable time of assisted reproduction; and

The husband never openly held out the child as his own.

The limitation provided in this section applies to a marriage declared invalid after assisted reproduction.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 1.

§ 14-2-906.
Effect of dissolution of marriage or withdrawal of consent.

If a marriage is dissolved before placement of eggs, sperm or embryos, the former spouse is not a parent of the resulting child unless the former spouse consented in a record that if assisted reproduction were to occur after a divorce, the former spouse would be a parent of the child.

The consent of a woman or a man to assisted reproduction may be withdrawn by that individual in a record at any time before placement of eggs, sperm or embryos. An individual who withdraws consent under this section is not a parent of the resulting child.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 1.

§ 14-2-907.
Parental status of deceased individual.

If an individual who consented in a record to be a parent by assisted reproduction dies before placement of eggs, sperm or embryos, the deceased individual is not a parent of the resulting child unless the deceased individual consented in a record that if assisted reproduction were to occur after death, the deceased individual would be a parent of the child.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 1.

Cited in

IC v. DW, 2015 WY 135,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 152

(Oct. 7,
2015).